Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1913.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 8320.2. Permissible argument for damages.(a) Permissible argument.--Except as provided under subsection (b), in any civil action tried before a judge, jury or other tribunal, an attorney may, during closing argument:(1) Specifically argue to the judge, jury or other tribunal in lump sums or by mathematical formula the amount the attorney deems to be an appropriate award for all past and future economic or noneconomic damages or both economic and noneconomic damages claimed to be recoverable.(2) On behalf of a defendant, argue to the judge, jury or other tribunal that an award of any lesser amount is 123456789101112131415161718 appropriate if there is a finding of liability against the defendant.(b) Prior disclosure required.--A party may not argue a sum as provided for under subsection (a) unless the party first discloses to the court and opposing counsel that the party intends to argue damages listed under subsection (a) prior to the presentation of closing arguments.(c) Jury instruction.--In a civil action tried before a jury, when lump sums or mathematical formulas are argued during closing arguments as provided for under subsection (a), the trial court shall instruct the jury that the sums or mathematical formulas argued are not evidence but only arguments and that the determination of the amount of appropriate damages to be awarded, if any, is solely for the jury's determination.(d) Construction.--(1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a defendant from arguing that the facts and evidence of the case support a finding of no liability.(2) Notwithstanding subsection (b), arguments as to appropriate amount of economic damages may be made without notice to opposing counsel if evidence supporting economic damages has been introduced at trial.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1913PN2394 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223